District of Columbia statutes.
47-1079

Golden Rule Plaza, Inc., Lots 837, 841, and 842, Square 525, and Lot 840, Square 526.

The real properties described as Lots 837, 841, and 842, Square 525, and Lot 840, Square 526, owned by Golden Rule Plaza, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, shall be exempt from all taxation for a period of 15 years so long as these real properties continue to be owned by Golden Rule Plaza, Inc., and are not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7012(b), 55 DCR 7598

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Golden Rule Plaza, Inc., Real Property Tax Exemption and Real Property Tax Relief Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-177, November 5, 2007, 54 DCR 11223).

Short Title

Short title: Section 7011 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle F of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Golden Rule Plaza, Inc., Real Property Tax Exemption and Real Property Tax Relief Act of 2008”.